Utah statutes.
78B-9-105.   Burden of proof.
(1)  The petitioner has the burden of pleading and proving by a preponderance
of the evidence the facts necessary to entitle the petitioner to relief.  The
court may not grant relief without determining that the petitioner is entitled
to relief under the provisions of this chapter and in light of the entire
record, including the record from the criminal case under review.
(2)  The respondent has the burden of pleading any ground of preclusion under
Section 78B-9-106, but once a ground has been pled, the petitioner has the
burden to disprove its existence by a preponderance of the evidence.
